Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Article 3. Copyright License Enforcement

§ 40-13-301.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Copyright owner” means the owner of a copyright of a nondramatic musical work recognized and enforceable under the copyright laws of the United States pursuant to Title 17 of the United States Code, P. L. 94-553 (17 U.S.C. § 101 et seq.). “Copyright owner” shall not include the owner of a copyright in a motion picture or audiovisual work or in part of a motion picture or audiovisual work;

“Performing rights society” means an association or corporation that licenses the public performance of nondramatic musical works on behalf of copyright owners, such as the American Society of Composers, Authors and Publishers (ASCAP), Broadcast Music, Inc. (BMI) and SESAC, Inc.;

“Proprietor” means the owner of a retail establishment, restaurant, inn, bar, tavern or any other place of business or professional office located in this state in which the public may assemble and in which nondramatic musical works may be performed, broadcast or otherwise transmitted;

“Royalty” or “royalties” means the fees payable to a performing rights society for public performance rights;

“This act” means W.S.

40-13-301

through

40-13-305

.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 64, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Application of “works for hire” doctrine under Copyright Act of 1976 (17 USC § 101 et seq.), 132 ALR Fed 301.

What constitutes derivative work under the Copyright Act of 1976, 149 ALR Fed 527.

§ 40-13-302.
Information required to be provided regarding royalty contracts; contract requirements.

No performing rights society shall enter into, or offer to enter into, a contract for the payment of royalties by a proprietor unless at the time of the offer, or any time thereafter, but no later than seventy-two (72) hours prior to the execution of that contract, it provides to the proprietor, in writing the following:

A schedule of the rates and terms of royalties under the contract;

Upon request of the proprietor, the opportunity to review the most current available list of the members or affiliates represented by the society;

Notice that it will make available, upon written request of any proprietor or bona fide trade association representing groups of proprietors, at the sole expense of the proprietor or bona fide trade association representing groups of proprietors, by electronic means or otherwise, the most current available listing of the copyrighted musical works in such performing rights society’s repertory. The notice shall specify the means by which the information can be secured;

Notice that the performing rights society has a toll free telephone number which can be used to answer inquiries of a proprietor regarding specific musical works and the copyright owners represented by that performing rights society; and

Notice that it complies with federal law and orders of courts having appropriate jurisdiction regarding the rates and terms of royalties and the circumstances under which licenses for rights for public performances are offered to any proprietor.

Every contract between a performing rights society and proprietor for the payment of royalties executed, issued or renewed in this state on or after July 1, 1996 shall:

Be in writing;

Be signed by the parties; and

Include at least the following information:

The proprietor’s name and business address and the name and location of each place of business to which the contract applies;

The name and address of the performing rights society;

The duration of the contract; and

The schedule of rates and terms of the royalties to be collected under the contract, including any sliding scale or schedule for any increase or decrease of those rates for the duration of that contract.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 64, § 1.

§ 40-13-303.
Restrictions.

No performing rights society or any agent or employee thereof shall:

With respect to a contract executed, issued or renewed on or after July 1, 1996, collect or attempt to collect from a proprietor licensed by that performing rights society a royalty payment except as provided in a contract executed pursuant to the provisions of this act;

Enter onto the premises of a proprietor’s business for the purpose of discussing a contract for payment of royalties for the use of copyrighted works by that proprietor without first identifying himself to the proprietor or his employees and disclosing that the agent is acting on behalf of the performing rights society and disclosing the purposes of the discussion.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 64, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 40-13-301(a)(v).

§ 40-13-304.
Civil actions.

Any person who suffers a violation of this act may bring an action to recover actual damages and reasonable attorney’s fees and seek an injunction or any other remedy available at law or in equity.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 64, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 40-13-301(a)(v).

§ 40-13-305.
Applicability.

This act shall not apply to contracts between performing rights societies and broadcasters licensed by the federal communications commission or to contracts with cable operators, programmers or other transmission services. This act also shall not apply to investigations conducted by law enforcement agencies.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 64, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 40-13-301(a)(v).